Washington statutes.
RCW 7.40.170

Bond for appearance.

If the court is not in session the officer making the arrest shall cause the person to enter into a bond, with surety, to be approved by the officer, conditioned that he or she personally appear in open court whenever his or her appearance shall be required, to answer such contempt, and that he or she will pay to the plaintiff all his or her damages and costs occasioned by the breach of the order; and in default thereof he or she shall be committed to the jail of the county until he or she shall enter into such bond with surety, or be otherwise legally discharged.

[ 2011 c 336 s 202; 1891 c 56 s 1; Code 1881 s 168; 1877 p 34 s 168; 1869 p 40 s 166; 1854 p 154 s 126; RRS s 734.]